Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-907.07
Executive Board of the Legislative Council; standing committees of the Legislature; powers and duties.

The chairperson of the Executive Board of the Legislative Council or committee staff member of the board shall refer materials received pursuant to section 84-907.06 for review (1) to the chairperson of the standing committee of the Legislature which has subject matter jurisdiction over the issue involved in the rule or regulation or which has traditionally handled the issue and (2) if practicable, to the member of the Legislature who was the primary sponsor of the legislative bill that granted the agency the rulemaking authority if the member is still serving or, if the legislative bill was amended to include the rulemaking authority, to the primary sponsor of the amendment granting rulemaking authority if the member is still serving. The committee or committee chairperson of such standing committee of the Legislature having subject matter jurisdiction may submit a written or oral statement at the public hearing on the rule or regulation or, if the Governor approves an emergency rule or regulation under section 84-901.04, may submit a written statement to the agency and to the Secretary of State to be entered in the records relating to the rule or regulation.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 25;

Laws 2005, LB 373, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB867, § 13.